District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.17

Sale of wood.

A cord of wood shall contain 128 cubic feet. Wood more than 8 inches in length shall be sold by the cord or fractional part thereof, and when delivered shall contain 128 cubic feet per cord when evenly and compactly stacked. Split wood, 8 inches or less in length, may be sold by such standard loads as shall be fixed by the Council of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1223, ch. 118, § 17

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-119.
1973 Ed., § 10-118.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(196) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.